Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201845-1211
Violation of act; action for recovery;
attorney's fees and costs.

Any individual, partnership, firm, limited liability company,
corporation, or company may bring an action to recover any damages caused
to such person or entity by a violation of the Nebraska Construction Prompt
Pay Act. In addition to an award of damages, the court may award a plaintiff
reasonable attorney's fees and costs as the court determines is appropriate.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 8.